Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 35.155, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Fencing. Farmed Cervidae must be confined in a manner designed to prevent escape. All perimeter fences for farmed Cervidae must be at least 96 inches in height and be constructed and maintained in a way that prevents the escape of farmed Cervidaedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end entry into the premises by free-roaming Cervidaedeleted text begin , and physical contact between farmed Cervidae and free-roaming Cervidaedeleted text end . The Board of Animal Health or commissioner of natural resources may determine whether the construction and maintenance of fencing is adequate to prevent deleted text begin physical contact ordeleted text end escape under this subdivision and may compel corrective action when fencing is determined to be inadequate. All new fencing installed and all fencing used to repair deficiencies must be high tensile. All entry areas for farmed Cervidae enclosure areas must have two redundant gates, which must be maintained to prevent the escape of animals through an open gate. If a fence deficiency allows entry or exit by farmed or wild Cervidae, the owner must immediately repair the deficiency. All other deficiencies must be repaired within a reasonable time, as determined by the Board of Animal Health, not to exceed 14 days. If a fence deficiency is detected during an inspection, the facility must be reinspected at least once in the subsequent three months. The farmed Cervidae owner must pay a reinspection fee equal to one-half the applicable annual inspection fee under subdivision 7a for each reinspection related to a fence violation. deleted text begin If the facility experiences more than one escape incident in any six-month period or fails to correct a deficiency found during an inspection, the board may revoke the facility's registration and order the owner to remove or destroy the animals as directed by the board. If the board revokes a facility's registration, the commissioner of natural resources may seize and destroy animals at the facility.deleted text end